California, session 20252026, SB44.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1798.122 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1798.122. (a) As used in this section:(1) “Brain-computer interface” means a system that allows direct communication and control between a person’s brain and an external device.(2) “Covered business” means a person who makes available a brain-computer interface to a person in this state.(b) A covered business shall use neural data collected through a brain-computer interface only for the purpose for which the neural data was collected.(c) A covered business shall delete neural data collected through a brain-computer interface when the purpose for which the neural data was collected is accomplished.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that this act furthers the purposes and intent of the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020.